District of Columbia statutes.
7-2003

Sources of funding.

The fund shall consist of, but not be limited to, money from the following sources:

(1)

Appropriations;

(2)

Grants or gifts from public or private sources to the fund or to the District for the purposes of the fund;

(3)

Repayments of principal and interest on loans provided from the fund;

(4)

Proceeds realized from the liquidation of a security interest held by the District on loans made from the fund;

(5)

Interest earned on the deposit or investment of money from the fund; and

(6)

All other revenue, receipts, or fees derived from the operation of the fund.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-220, § 4, 36 DCR 550
1981 Ed., § 6-3603.